District of Columbia statutes.
20-1304

Subsequent administration.

If property is discovered after an estate has been closed and the appointment of the personal representative has been terminated pursuant to section 20-1301 , the Court, upon petition of any interested person and upon such notice as it may direct, may appoint the same or a successor personal representative and make any other appropriate order. Any further proceedings shall be conducted pursuant to the applicable provisions of this title but no claim previously barred may be asserted in the subsequent administration.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-1304.